District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-201.01

Definitions.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-49, § 101, 34 DCR 6856
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(y), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 41-401.

Editor's Notes

Applicability date of D.C. Law 18-378: Section 5 of D.C. Law 18-378, as amended by section 7082 of D.C. Law 19-21, provided: “Sec. 5. Applicability. This act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.”.

Section 89(a) of D.C. Law 19-171 corrected the law reference in D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(y).